District of Columbia statutes.
31-5514

Immunity from liability.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against any member insurer, the Association or its agents or employees, the board of directors, or the Mayor or his or her representatives for any action taken or any failure to act by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this chapter.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 15, 40 DCR 6120
1981 Ed., § 35-3914.